Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions
35-1-19.
Disclosure of arrest booking photographs prohibited.

As used in this Code section, the term “booking photograph” means a photograph or image of an individual taken by an arresting law enforcement agency for the purpose of identification or taken when such individual was processed into a jail.

Except as provided in Code Section 50-18-77 and booking photographs required for publication as set forth in Titles 16 and 40, for the State Sexual Offender Registry, and for use by law enforcement agencies for administrative purposes, an arresting law enforcement agency or agent thereof shall not post booking photographs to or on a website.

An arresting law enforcement agency shall not provide or make available a copy of a booking photograph in any format to a person requesting such photograph if:

Such booking photograph may be placed in a publication or posted to a website or transferred to a person to be placed in a publication or posted to a website; and

Removal or deletion of such booking photograph from such publication or website requires the payment of a fee or other consideration.

When a person requests a booking photograph, he or she shall submit a statement affirming that the use of such photograph is in compliance with subsection (c) of this Code section. Any person who knowingly makes a false statement in requesting a booking photograph shall be guilty of a violation of Code Section 16-10-20.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 742, § 1/HB 845.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014,
Code Section 35-1-18, as enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 742, § 1/HB 845,
was redesignated as Code Section 35-1-19.

35-1-20.
Retention of weapons by officers following employment.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Honorable conditions” means conditions of having satisfied, met, or exceeded the conduct and performance standards established by the state entity for sworn police officers.

“State entity” means any state department, agency, board, bureau, office, commission, public corporation, system, or authority.

The governing authority of each municipality and county in this state and each board of education which employs sworn police officers who are certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council may adopt policies under which such sworn police officers, upon their retirement from employment by such municipality, county, or board of education or upon leaving such employment as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, shall be entitled, as part of their compensation, to retain their weapon and badge.

Except where otherwise provided for by law for a state entity, each state entity which employs sworn police officers who are certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council shall adopt rules, regulations, or policies under which such sworn police officers, upon their retirement from employment by such state entity or upon leaving such employment as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, shall be entitled, as part of their compensation, to retain their weapon and badge; provided, however, that such sworn police officers retire or leave under honorable conditions.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 823, § 1/SB 263; Ga. L. 2017, p. 24, § 2/SB 18.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added subsection (a); designated the previously existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (b); in subsection (b), substituted “sworn police officers” for “sworn officers” in the middle, and substituted “their” for “his or her” twice near the end; and added subsection (c).

35-1-21.
Development of guidelines and procedures for training in identifying domestic terrorism and reporting information to Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center.

The Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall establish guidelines and procedures for the incorporation of training materials and information in methods for:

Identifying and reporting activity that may lead to domestic terrorism;

Combating domestic terrorism; and

Individuals, law enforcement officials, and personnel within state agencies and departments and local governments to provide information to the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center to report activity that may lead to domestic terrorism.

The guidelines and procedures listed in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be for use by law enforcement training centers monitored by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council and monitored and funded by the Georgia Public Safety Training Center in all courses for which they have responsibility and oversight.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 536, § 5-1/HB 452.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 536, § 1-1/HB 452, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Protect Georgia Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 enactment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2017).

35-1-22.
Prohibition on law enforcement retaining license plate data obtained from automated license plate recognition systems; limited use of data; public disclosure prohibited.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Automated license plate recognition system” means one or more high-speed cameras combined with computer algorithms used to convert images of license plates into computer readable data.

“Captured license plate data” means the global positioning device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate number, and any other data captured by or derived from an automated license plate recognition system or any other source.

“Law enforcement agency” means the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Transportation, and any other state, federal, local, public transit, school, college, or university agency that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime, local government code enforcement, and the enforcement of penal, traffic, toll violation, regulatory, game, or controlled substance laws.

“Law enforcement purpose” means the investigation of an offense or activity initiated by a law enforcement agency.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, company, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, or any other unincorporated association or group.

Law enforcement agencies may collect captured license plate data. Such data shall be stored immediately upon collection and not accessed except for a law enforcement purpose. All such data collected shall be destroyed no later than 30 months after such data were originally collected unless such data are the subject matter of a toll violation or for a law enforcement purpose.

Law enforcement agencies may exchange or share captured license plate data with other law enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes.

Any person who knowingly requests, uses, obtains, or attempts to obtain captured license plate data of a law enforcement agency under false pretenses or for any purpose other than for a law enforcement purpose shall for each such offense, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to preclude a law enforcement agency from contracting with a person to hold and maintain captured license plate data for such law enforcement agency; provided, however, that such person shall be subject to the policies of the law enforcement agency and paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Any law enforcement agency deploying an automated license plate recognition system shall maintain policies for the use and operation of such system, including but not limited to policies for the training of law enforcement officers in the use of captured license plate data consistent with this Code section.

Captured license plate data collected by a law enforcement agency shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 758, § 1/HB 79.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

35-1-23.
Law enforcement agencies required to enter certain information into federal Violent Criminal Apprehension Program; removal of information; applicability.

As used in this Code section, the term “data base” means the national data base of the Violent Criminal Apprehension Program established and maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation or a successor data base.

Each law enforcement agency in this state shall request access from the Federal Bureau of Investigation to enter information into the data base.

Each law enforcement agency that investigates a homicide or attempted homicide in which the actions of the perpetrator are known or suspected to be serial in nature or are random or sexually oriented; a rape, aggravated sodomy, or aggravated assault with the intent to rape in which the actions of the perpetrator are known or suspected to be serial in nature or in which the assault was committed by a stranger; a missing person case in which the circumstances indicate a strong possibility of foul play; or a case involving unidentified human remains from a known or suspected homicide shall enter into the data base the following information regarding such investigation, as available:

The name and date of birth of the alleged perpetrator;

The specific crime being investigated;

A description of the manner in which the crime was committed, including any pattern of conduct occurring during the course of multiple crimes suspected to have been committed by the alleged perpetrator; and

Any other information required by the Federal Bureau of Investigation for inclusion in the data base.

Such information shall be updated with any new developments in the investigation every 60 days thereafter.

Any individual who was deemed an alleged perpetrator and who had any information collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section may seek removal of such information by:

Submitting a request in writing for the removal of all such information, along with all supporting documentation regarding such request, to the investigating law enforcement agency; or

If the investigating law enforcement agency denies the request to remove such information, the individual may file a petition of removal with the superior court in the jurisdiction of the investigating law enforcement agency.

In considering a petition of removal pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider:

Any evidence introduced by the petitioner;

Any evidence introduced by the investigating law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction where the petition is filed; and

Any other relevant evidence.

The court shall order a hearing on the petition if requested by the petitioner. The court may issue an order removing the petitioner’s name and information from the data base if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner’s information should be removed from the data base. The court shall send a copy of any order directing the removal of the petitioner’s name and information from the data base to the investigating law enforcement agency.

Information entered into the data base under this Code section shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

This Code section shall apply to any pending investigation of an allegation of rape, aggravated sodomy, or aggravated assault with intent to rape, regardless of whether the investigation was commenced before, on, or after July 1, 2021.

This Code section shall not apply to offenses when the victim is at least 14 but less than 16 years of age and the offender is 18 years of age or younger and is not more than four years older than the victim.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-1-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 567, § 5/HB 255.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, “July 1, 2021” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 567, § 1/HB 255, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Sexual Assault Reform Act of 2021.”’